Massachusetts, session 194th, H5061.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 58 of chapter 207 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in line 2, the word “his” and inserting in place
thereof the following word:- their.
SECTION 2. Said section 58 of said chapter 207 is hereby further amended by inserting,
in line 3, after the word “number” the following words:- , email address.
SECTION 3. Said section 58 of said chapter 207, is hereby further amended by striking,
in lines 6 to 7, inclusive, words “newspaper, magazine, telephone directory or other publication
of general circulation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- printed or digital
public media, such as a telephone directory, electronic or computer accessed justice of the peace
directory, newspaper or other periodical, or through written, electronic, computer-accessed or
similar types of communication, including websites, social media platforms, and digital video
platforms.
of 1